Oklahoma, session 2025, SB209.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5008.10 of Title 74, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created the Taiwan Regional Trade Office.
B. The Office shall be an administrative component of the
Oklahoma Department of Commerce.
C. The Office shall:
1. Facilitate economic relationships between Oklahoma-based
businesses and business entities with principal business activity
which is based or occurs regionally to Taiwan that shall not include

any authoritarian or totalitarian government the sovereign powers of
which are exercised through a single person or group of persons who
are not elected by any form of legitimate popular voting;
2. Promote Oklahoma-based business and establish business-to-
business trading activity with business entities based regionally to
Taiwan;
3. Provide information about business trading opportunities
with business entities based regionally to Taiwan for Oklahoma-based
businesses;
4. Facilitate positive relationships between this state and its
political subdivisions with the relevant governments based
regionally to Taiwan that are consistent with United States foreign
policy and any applicable trade or travel restrictions;
5. Coordinate the activities of the Oklahoma Department of
Commerce with respect to business outreach specific to entities
based regionally to Taiwan;
6. Coordinate, organize, support, and fund travel from Oklahoma
to entities based regionally to Taiwan and return as part of an
ongoing mission to establish and maintain relationships between
Oklahoma and countries in the region with the objective of creating
trade opportunities for Oklahoma-based business enterprises;
7. Manage actions taking place at the federal level whose
primary objective promotes business-to-business transactions between
entities based regionally to Taiwan and the United States with
emphasis on promoting Oklahoma-based business activity;
8. Conduct training programs for Oklahoma-based business owners
to inform them of potential trading opportunities with entities
based regionally to Taiwan;
9. Produce promotional and educational materials for
distribution by business organizations, trade associations, or
similar entities consistent with the mission of the Office; and
10. Take such other actions or develop such programs consistent
with the mission of developing business-to-business opportunities
ENR. S. B. NO. 209 Page 2

between entities based regionally to Taiwan and Oklahoma-based
business enterprises.
D. The Taiwan Regional Trade Office shall maintain a physical
office in Taipei, Taiwan.
E. 1. No later than January 1, 2029, the Oklahoma Department
of Commerce shall conduct a cost/benefit analysis to determine the
estimated net direct state benefits applicable for a three-year
period beginning with the first complete calendar quarter.
2. If the Oklahoma Department of Commerce determines that the
Office failed to meet the estimated net direct state benefit for
operations, the Department shall cease operation of the Office. As
used in this section, “estimated net direct state benefits” means
the estimated direct state benefits less the estimated direct state
costs.
F. The Oklahoma Department of Commerce shall promulgate any
rules necessary to implement the provisions of this section.
ENR. S. B. NO. 209 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 209 Page 4